Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.260

Procedure where execution unsatisfied.

If the execution is returned unsatisfied, in whole or in part, the plaintiff may proceed as in other cases upon the return of an execution.

[ 1987 c 442 s 826; 1886 p 45 s 27; RRS s 669. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.230.]